Arkansas, session 2025, SB487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-27-309(b), concerning expungement of
delinquency adjudications under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) Records of delinquency adjudications for a felony involving
violence as defined under § 5-4-501 shall be kept for ten (10) years after
the last adjudication of delinquency or the date of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere or a finding of guilt as an adult.
(B) Thereafter they may be expunged.
(2) Records of all other delinquency adjudications shall be
expunged upon the individual's twenty-first birthday.
(2)(3) The court may expunge other juvenile records at any time
and shall expunge all the records of a juvenile upon his or her twenty-first
birthday, in other types of delinquency, dependency-neglect, or families in
need of services cases.
(3)(4) For purposes of this section, “expunge” means to destroy
seal as defined in § 16-90-1404.
*LJH202*
03-20-2025 14:12:35 LJH202

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB487

/s/Irvin


































03-20-2025 14:12:35 LJH202